lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_finalE.txt
!======================================================
LEXICON VerbPostbaseII
!  verb-elaborating [VV] and nominalizing [VN] suffixes
!  when suffixing to verb roots that end in -e
!======================================================

0:0  NegationII;

^~sf–ghhaleg(V→XCLM):^ghhalek                  #;               ! how V! (exclamation)

^–ghllagu(V→V):^ghllagu                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be very V; to be busy V-ing
^@laataqu(V→V):^laataqu                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to luckily have V-ed well
^–llgu(V→V):^llgu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V well 
^@~f–neghtu(V→V):^%{.f.%}neghtu                VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually; to V frequently
^~fnga(V→V):^%{.f.%}nga                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be in a state of V or of having V-ed
^~%:(ng)u(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngu                     VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be V-ing; to be V-habitually or as an occupation; while in the process of V-ing
^@–nqegsi(V→V):^nqegsi                         VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be good with respect to V-ing
^–pigu(V→V):^pigu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be so V
^–qaqu(V→V):^qaqu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V intermittently
^–qu(V→V):^qu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to repeatedly V 
^+tu(V→V):^tu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually
^–tu(V→V):^tu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually
^+tulli(V→V):^tulli                            VerbPostbaseI;   ! for it to be getting feasible to go V-ing b
^+tutka(V→V):^tutka                            VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be V to an indicated degree
^@~f–yu(V→V):^%{.f.%}yu                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be good at V-ing; to generally V well
^@~fyuguma(V→V):^%{.f.%}yuguma                 VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be easy to V
^@~fyuneghtu(V→V):^%{.f.%}yuneghtu             VerbPostbaseI;   ! to love to V
^~i(V→V):^%{.f.%}i                             VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V something; to suffer something's V-ing
^––iqe(V→V):^%{.mm.%}iqe                       VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's V-ing over a period of time
^–lgutke(V→V):^lgutke                          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–llgilliqe(V→V):^llgilliqe                    VerbPostbaseII;  ! to experience trouble in V-ing 
^+lliqe(V→V):^lliqe                            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^–lliqe(V→V):^lliqe                            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanighqe             VerbPostbaseII;  ! to make one cease V-ing
^@~fnaqutke(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqutke               VerbPostbaseII;  ! to try to V (it)
^@~fnatke(V→V):^%{.f.%}natke                   VerbPostbaseII;  ! to use or have (it) in order to V
^~–qaghaqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}qaghaqe                VerbPostbaseII;  ! to intermittently V; to V now and then
^@~%:(u)tke(V→V):^%{.f.%}utke                  VerbPostbaseII;  ! to V over or on account of
^@~fvike(V→V):^%{.f.%}vike                     VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have as a place or as object of one's V-ing
^@~f–yiilliqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}yiilliqe            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^@~fmiqe(CmpdVbl):^%{.f.%}miqe                 VerbPostbaseII;  ! to compel one to V; to make one V
^+qe(V→V):^qe                                  VerbPostbaseII;  ! to act on so as to cause to V
^~sf%:(e)sqe(CmpdVbl):^sqe                     VerbPostbaseII;  ! to ask one to V; to tell one to V
^+te(V→V):^%{t%}e                              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to act on so as to cause to V
^–ghllag(V→V):^ghllag                          VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V or be V in a big way; to V for a long time
^–ghraag(V→V):^ghraag                          VerbPostbaseIII; ! to do some V-ing; to gradually V; to get V-er; to be somewhat V
^–llaag(V→V):^llaag                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a crude or clumsy way; crude one V-s
^+llug(V→V):^llug                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
^–llug(V→V):^llug                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
^–msug(V→V):^msug                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to casually V; to nonchalantly V
^@~f–neghllug(V→V):^%{.f.%}neghllug            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
^+pag(V→V):^pag                                VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
^–pag(V→V):^pag                                VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
^–pagllag(V→V):^pagllag                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V too much, so much, intensively, excessively
^–pigllag(V→V):^pigllag                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to really, really V; to V all the way 
^–qrug(V→V):^qrug                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! for troublesome one to V 
^+raag(V→V):^raag                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to do some V-ing; to kind of, but not exactly
^+saag(V→V):^saag                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^–saag(V→V):^saag                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^~f–vag(V→V):^%{.f.%}vag                       VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V hard; to V intensely
^@~f–yaag(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaag                    VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^@~fyug(V→V):^%{.f.%}yug                       VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want to V; to tend toward V-ing; to feel V
^+(te)stepag(CmpdVbl):^stepag                  VerbPostbaseIII; ! to cause or allow one to V too much
^+(te)sug(CmpdVbl):^sug                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want one to V
^~f(a)ghesnagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}aghesnagh          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to just V; to V just now; to only V (and perhaps in vain)
^~aghtagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}aghtagh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V repeatedly with back and forth movement
^~aatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}aatagh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V finally or repeatedly and persistently, several times
^~(at)aghagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}ataghagh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V-er; to V more; to be more V
^–ghrukutaagh(V→V):^ghrukutaagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! for very large, huge one to V 
^~–(ghw/ngw/w)aagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngwaagh        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to diligently V; to thoroughly V; to V at the proper time; to V attentively
^~fiiraagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}iiraagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to play at V-ing; to keep on V-ing
^@~%:(i/u)manginagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}umanginagh    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V continuously, all the time; to keep V-ing 
^~–kanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}kanigh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be rather V; to be fairly V; to V more and more
^~–kataghagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}kataghagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to finally V despite a feeling that it wouldn't happen; to V at last
^–kestagh(V→V):^kestagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V ahead of time; to V patiently; to V slowly; to V peacefully; to V leisurely; to start V-ing (for seasons and atmospheric phenomena)
^–kusiigh(V→V):^kusiigh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to casually V; to slowly V
^@~flaatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}laatagh               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V again; to V more; to V anyway
^@–lghaghtugh(V→V):^lghaghtugh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V already, unexpectedly, surprisingly
^–lgusigh(V→V):^lgusigh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–llegagh(V→V):^llegagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V crudely
^–lqinagh(V→V):^lqinagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a long time
^–lqiinagh(V→V):^lqiinagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a long time
^–lqusiigh(V→V):^lqusiigh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little; little one V-s
^@lugh(V→V):^lugh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V angrily
^–mlaagh(V→V):^mlaagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mraagh(V→V):^mraagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mzaagh(V→V):^mzaagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mleghagh(V→V):^mleghagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mreghagh(V→V):^mreghagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mzegagh(V→V):^mzegagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–vlaagh(V→V):^vlaagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–vleghagh(V→V):^vleghagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–msiigh(V→V):^msiigh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V ineffectively or without putting effort into it; to V under conditions of hardship
^@~fnagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nagh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cause V-ing
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanigh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnaqelqusiigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqelqusiigh     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to stall or delay at V-ing.
^@~fnasiigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nasiigh               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to put off V-ing; to stall at V-ing; to V angrily
^@~f–neghsigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}neghsigh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to wait for (it) to V; to wait for (it) to be V or to become V
^–ngeltagh(V→V):^ngeltagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^–ngertagh(V→V):^ngertagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^–ngestagh(V→V):^ngestagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^%:(ng)inagh(V→V):^nginagh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to only V; to go right on V-ing
^–ngllagh(V→V):^ngllagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to endeavor to induce one to V; to make one V
^@~fniigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}niigh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hunt by means of V-ing; to carry out the process of V-ing
^@–nqegsagh(V→V):^nqegsagh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V completely, correctly, thoroughly
^~f(p/v)agaatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}vagaatagh        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V repeatedly and hard
^–pagnanigh(V→V):^pagnanigh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cease V-ing too much; to quit V-ing too much
^–pestaagh(V→V):^pestaagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to truly V
^–pigagh(V→V):^pigagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V exaclty (location)
^–pigesnagh(V→V):^pigesnagh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in vain; to V for naught; to finally V
^~–qagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}qagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! please V; just V; suddenly V; briefly
^~–qaghtagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}qaghtagh              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to continuously V with back and forth or up and down movement
^–qragh(V→V):^qragh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to do fancy V-ing; to V a new thing
^@qugh(V→V):^qugh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V all things available; to V completely
^–raaghinagh(V→V):^raaghinagh*                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to only V; to do nothing but V (ironically?) 
^@~fragh(V→V):^%{.f.%}ragh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to repeatedly or continuously V though perhaps unnecessarily or unsucessfully
^@~f–ragkiigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}ragkiigh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V quickly
^@~f–rakguugh(V→V):^%{.f.%}rakguugh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be fast at V-ing; to learn to V quickly
^+rragh(V→V):^rragh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a fancy way
^+sagh(V→V):^sagh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cause one to V or be V-ed; to endeavor to V
^+saghtugh(V→V):^saghtugh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be about to V; to go somewhere to V
^+sigh(V→V):^sigh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to wait for (it) to V; to cause to V
^–sighwaagh(V→V):^sighwaagh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to pretend to V; to V without putting effort into it; half-heartedly V
